Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1556
Declaration of purpose.

The Legislature finds and declares that uniformity in the manner of construction, assembly, and use of modular housing units and that of their systems, components, and appliances, including their plumbing, heating, and electrical systems, is extremely desirable in order that owners may not be burdened with differing requirements and in order to promote construction which will foster the health and safety of the numerous persons living in modular housing units.

Laws 1976, LB 248, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 822, § 2.